src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-aqm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aʼm: # Noun 152 'eng /est kuub/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼm+N+Sg+Nom: [aʼm, am]
     aʼm+N+Sg+Gen: [aʼm, am]
     aʼm+N+Sg+Par: [aʼmtõ, amtõ]
     aʼm+N+Sg+Dat: [aʼmmõn, ammõn]
     aʼm+N+Sg+Ins: [aʼmkõks, amkõks]
     aʼm+N+Sg+Ill: [aʼmmõ, ammõ]
     aʼm+N+Sg+Ela: [aʼmstõ, amstõ]
     aʼm+N+Pl+Nom: [aʼmmõd, ammõd]
     aʼm+N+Pl+Gen: [aʼmmõd, ammõd]
     aʼm+N+Pl+Par: [aʼmmidi, ammidi]
     aʼm+N+Pl+Dat: [aʼmmõdõn, ammõdõn]
     aʼm+N+Pl+Ins: [aʼmmõdõks, ammõdõks]
     aʼm+N+Pl+Ill: [aʼmmiž, ammiž]
     aʼm+N+Pl+Ela: [aʼmmist, ammist]
